Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2230
Practical nursing; license; title or abbreviation; use.

Any person who holds a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title Licensed Practical Nurse and the abbreviation L.P.N. No other person shall assume or use such title or abbreviation or any words, letters, signs, or devices to indicate that the person using the same is authorized to practice practical nursing in this state.

Laws 1955, c. 272, § 12, p. 860;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.41;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 786.